California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
Property owned by a nonprofit entity, in which a transit development board has the sole ownership interest in the entity, shall be deemed to be property owned by the transit development board for purposes of this division. To the extent that the property is possessed, or a claim to or right to possession of the property exists, for other than public purposes, the interest shall be deemed a possessory interest as defined in Section 107.

It is the intent and purpose of this section to clarify Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and, therefore, this section does not constitute a change in, but is
 declaratory of, the existing law. Furthermore, this section shall not be construed to exempt, from ad valorem property taxation, property of any transit development board located outside of its boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

201.2.

(a) A nonprofit corporation which has contracted with the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 25905, 25906, 25907, or 25908 of the Government Code for the conduct of an agricultural fair, shall be deemed to be an agency of the county for purposes of this part and for no other purpose, and county-owned property, including possessory interests in that property, used or possessed by the nonprofit corporation in the conduct of an agricultural fair shall be exempt from taxation under subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the State Constitution. 

(b) This section
 shall not be construed to exempt any profit-making organization or concessionaire from any property tax, including a property tax on a possessory interest, for the use of property which is used by a nonprofit corporation for the conduct of a fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

201.3.

Property which is exclusively devoted to public purposes and is owned by a nonprofit entity, in which a chartered city with a population of over 750,000 and located in a county of the third class has the sole ownership interest shall be deemed to be property owned by the chartered city.

This section shall not be construed to exempt from ad valorem property taxation property of the chartered city located outside of its boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1412, Sec. 1.   Applicable July 1, 1988, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1412.)
-------------------------------------------

201.4.

(a) The possessory interest of a nonprofit entity, solely owned by the City of Palm Springs, in property which is located wholly within the boundaries of an Indian reservation and owned by the United States in trust for named Indian allottees, and which is leased to the City of Palm Springs under a master lease a portion of which for purposes of financing is subleased to a nonprofit entity, and subleased by that nonprofit entity to the City of Palm Springs which devotes that property exclusively to convention or related public purposes, shall be deemed to be property owned by the City of Palm Springs.

(b) Property which is owned in fee by a nonprofit entity in which the City of Palm Springs has the sole ownership interest, and leased by that nonprofit entity to the City of Palm Springs which devotes that property exclusively to convention or related public purposes, shall be deemed to be property owned by the City of Palm Springs.

(c) This section shall not be construed to exempt from ad valorem property taxation any possessory interest in otherwise tax-exempt property not devoted exclusively to convention or related public purposes or any property or possessory interest in property of the City of Palm Springs located outside of its boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   Effective September 20, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

201.5.

(a) Possessory interests in property acquired by or for the Capital Programs and Climate Financing Authority pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 44500) of the Health and Safety Code, whether in real or personal property, shall be subject to taxation under this code.

(b) If the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (a) is less than the amount of tax which would have been imposed if the participating party owned the pollution control facility, the contract or lease between the
 Capital Programs and Climate Financing Authority and such party shall provide that the difference between the amount of tax paid pursuant to subdivision (a) and the amount determined on the basis of the full cash value of the property shall be paid by such party to the tax collector for the taxing agency at the same time as the property tax is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 710, Sec. 18.   (AB 786)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

201.6.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), property that is exclusively devoted to a public purpose and is owned by a nonprofit entity, the property, assets, profits, and net revenues of which are irrevocably dedicated to the Ventura Port District, shall be deemed to be property that is owned by the Ventura Port District.

(b) This section shall not be construed to exempt from ad valorem property taxation, including, but not limited to, any ad valorem property tax levied with respect to a
 possessory interest, either of the following:

(1) Any property owned by a profit-making organization or concessionaire.

(2) Any property of the Ventura Port District that is located outside of the boundaries of that district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

201.7.

A qualified nonprofit organization that has entered into an agreement with the Department of Parks and Recreation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5080.42 of the Public Resources Code for the development, improvement, restoration, care, maintenance, administration, or operation of a unit or units, or portion of a unit, of the state park system shall be deemed to be an agent of the state for purposes of this division and for no other purpose, and any state-owned property, including possessory interests in that property, used or possessed by the qualified nonprofit organization for the development, improvement, restoration, care, maintenance, administration, or operation of a unit or units, or portion of a unit, of the state park system shall be exempt from taxation under subdivision (a) of Section 3 of
 Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 134, Sec. 3.   (SB 1464)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

202.

(a) The exemption of the following property is as specified in subdivisions (a), (b), (d), and (h) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a) of Section 11 thereof:

(1) Growing crops.

(2) Property used for free public libraries and free museums.

(3) Property used exclusively for public schools, community colleges, state colleges, and state universities, including the University of California.

(4) Property
 belonging to this state, a county, or a city. Property belonging to the State Compensation Insurance Fund is not property belonging to this state.

(b) (1) The exemption described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall apply to off-campus facilities owned or leased by an apprenticeship program sponsor, if such facilities are used exclusively by the public schools for classes of related and supplemental instruction for apprentices or trainees which are conducted by the public schools under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(2) The exemption described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) shall apply to an interest in property, including a possessory interest as defined in Section 107, belonging to the state, a county, a
 city, a school district, a community college district, or any combination thereof, that is used to provide rental housing for employees of one or more public school districts or community college
 districts.

(c) Without prejudice to the right to assert an exemption otherwise available under subdivision (a), (d), or (e) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution, a property tax under this division shall be imposed upon that portion of the bookstore property determined to be generating the unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent property is:

(1) Owned by an educational institution of collegiate grade or used by a nonprofit corporation operating a student bookstore affiliated with such an educational institution, and

(2) Is primarily devoted to bookstore use that produces income that is taxable as unrelated business
 taxable income.

This tax shall be determined by establishing a ratio of the unrelated business taxable income to the bookstore’s gross income as defined by the Internal Revenue Code. That percent shall be the maximum percentage of such bookstore property on which a property tax can be levied.

At the end of a fiscal year when unrelated business income has been generated, the nonprofit organization shall file with the assessor copies of the organization’s most recent tax return filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 717, Sec. 3.   (AB 1157)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

202.2.

Any reduction in property taxes on leased property used for libraries and museums that are free and open to the public, leased property used exclusively for public schools, community colleges, state colleges, or state universities, including the University of California, or leased property used exclusively for educational purposes by a nonprofit institution of higher education and granted the exemption set forth in subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall inure to the benefit of the lessee institution. If the lessor claims the exemption and if the lease or rental agreement does not specifically provide that
 the exemption contained in subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3 of Article XIII is taken into account in fixing the terms of the agreement, the lessee shall receive a reduction in rental payments or a refund thereof, if already paid, in an amount equal to the reduction in taxes.

If the lessor does not claim the exemption on property eligible for the exemption contained in subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3 of Article XIII, the lessee may file a claim for refund under Section 5096 with respect to taxes paid by the lessor on the property. For purposes of Sections 5097 and 5140, the lessee shall be deemed to be the person who paid the tax, and the refund shall be made directly to the lessee. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 270, the full amount of tax paid by the lessor shall be refunded to the lessee.

Any refund granted pursuant to this part shall not be considered a reduction in
 the sales price or gross receipts from the rental of the property for purposes of Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001), Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200), or Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 283.)
-------------------------------------------

202.5.

Personal property used exclusively in the performance of activities authorized by Division 8 (commencing with Section 89000) of the Education Code, whether by the college itself or by an auxiliary nonprofit corporation or student body organization with which the Director of Education has entered into a lease or contract for the performance of such activities, is deemed property used exclusively for public schools and shall be exempt from taxation.

It is hereby declared that this section is not a change in the present law but is a declaration of preexisting law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 261, Sec. 11.2.)
-------------------------------------------

202.6.

Personal property used exclusively in the performance of activities authorized by Article 2 (commencing with Section 48930) of Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of, or Article 4 (commencing with Section 76060) of Chapter 1 of Part 47 of Division 7 of the Education Code by a student body organization acting pursuant to those provisions, is deemed property used exclusively for public schools and shall be exempt from taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 261, Sec. 11.3.)
-------------------------------------------

202.7.

Personal property owned or used by student governments of the University of California or by nonprofit corporations operating student book stores of colleges affiliated with the University of California is, for purposes of this section, deemed property belonging to this state and shall be exempt from taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

(a) The college exemption is as specified in subdivision (e) of Section 3 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(b) An educational institution of collegiate grade is an institution incorporated as a college or seminary of learning that requires for regular admission the completion of a four-year high school course or its equivalent, and confers upon its graduates at least one academic or professional degree, based on a course of at least one year in flight
 test technology or flight test science, for which the master’s degree program has been approved by the California Council for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education or the Bureau for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education, on a course of at least two years in liberal arts and sciences, or on a course of at least three years in professional studies, such as law, theology, education, medicine, dentistry, engineering, veterinary medicine, pharmacy, architecture, fine arts, commerce, or journalism.

(c) An educational institution of collegiate grade is not conducted for profit when it is conducted exclusively for scientific or educational purposes and no part of its net income inures to the benefit of any private person.

(d) Without prejudice to the right to assert an exemption otherwise available under subdivision (a), (d), or (e) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the
 Constitution, a property tax under this division shall be imposed upon that portion of the bookstore property determined to be generating the unrelated business taxable income, as defined in Section 512 of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent property is both of the following:

(1) Owned by an educational institution of collegiate grade or used by a nonprofit corporation operating a student bookstore affiliated with an educational institution of collegiate grade.

(2) Primarily devoted to bookstore use that produces income that is taxable as unrelated business taxable income.

This tax shall be determined by establishing a ratio of the unrelated business taxable income to the bookstore’s gross income as defined by the Internal Revenue Code. That percent shall be the maximum percentage of the bookstore property on which a property tax can
 be levied.

At the end of a fiscal year when unrelated business income has been generated, the nonprofit organization shall file with the assessor copies of the organization’s most recent tax return filed with the Internal Revenue Service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   Effective September 18, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

203.1.

Personal property owned or used by a nonprofit corporation operating a student bookstore affiliated with an educational institution, as defined in Section 203, is, for purposes of this section, deemed property belonging to such educational institution and shall be exempt from taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 588.)
-------------------------------------------

203.5.

Property owned by the California School of Mechanical Arts, California Academy of Sciences, or Cogswell Polytechnical College, or held in trust for the Huntington Library and Art Gallery, or their successors, shall be exempt from taxation as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

The cemetery exemption is as specified in subdivision (g) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

The veterans’ exemption is as specified in subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

The following are wars under subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution:

(a) Revolutionary War, April 19, 1775–January 14, 1784.

(b) Second War With England, June 18, 1812–February 17, 1815.

(c) Black Hawk War, April 6, 1832–August 2, 1832.

(d) War With Mexico, April 24, 1846–May 30, 1848.

(e) Civil War, April 18, 1861–August 20, 1866.

(f) War With Spain, April 21, 1898–April 11, 1899.

(g) War in Philippines, April 11, 1899–July 4, 1902.

(h) Chinese Relief Expedition, June 20, 1900–May 15, 1901.

(i) Campaign against the Rogue River, Yakima, Nez Percé, and Snake Indians in Oregon and Washington, 1855–1856.

(j) Campaign against the Indians in southern Oregon and Idaho and northern California and Nevada, 1865–1868.

(k) Campaign against the
 Cheyennes, Arapahoes, Kiowas, and Comanches in Kansas, Colorado, and Indian Territory, 1867–1869.

(l) Modoc War, 1872–1873.

(m) Campaign against the Apaches in Arizona, 1873.

(n) Campaign against the Kiowas, Comanches, and Cheyennes in Kansas, Colorado, Texas, Indian Territory, and New Mexico, 1874–1875.

(o) Campaign against the Northern Cheyennes and Sioux, 1876–1877.

(p) Nez Percé War, 1877.

(q) Bannock War, 1878.

(r) Campaign against the Northern Cheyennes, 1878–1879.

(s) Campaign against
 the Ute Indians in Colorado and Utah, September, 1879–November, 1880.

(t) Campaign against the Apache Indians in Arizona, 1885–1886.

(u) Campaign against the Sioux Indians in South Dakota, November, 1890–January, 1891.

(v) War With Germany-Austria, April 6, 1917–November 11, 1918.

(w) Campaign against the Apache Indians in Arizona, 1895–1896.

(x) World War II, December 7, 1941, to January 1, 1947.

(y) Campaign against the North Koreans and Chinese Communists in Korea, June 27, 1950, to January 31, 1955.

(z) Campaign against the Viet Cong and North Vietnamese
 Communists in South Vietnam, August 5, 1964, to May 8, 1975.

The following are campaigns under subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution:

(a) First Nicaraguan campaign.

(b) Second Nicaraguan campaign.

(c) Yangtze River campaign in China.

(d) All other campaigns for service in which a medal has been issued by the Congress of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

205.1.

Section 205 of this code fulfills the intent of subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution. To further carry out the intent of subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution, if the assessment ratio is increased from 25 percent to 100 percent the amount of assessed value subject to the exemption shall be increased from one thousand dollars ($1,000) to four thousand dollars ($4,000) in order to maintain the same proportionate value of the exemption. Whenever assessed value is used to determine eligibility for such exemption based on the limitations on the value of property owned, 25 percent of the
 assessed value shall be used when the assessment ratio is increased to 100 percent to maintain the same proportionate values of such property and such limitations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

205.5.

(a) Property that constitutes the principal place of residence of a veteran, that is owned by the veteran, the veteran’s spouse, or the veteran and the veteran’s spouse jointly, is exempted from taxation on that part of the full value of the residence that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (i), if the veteran is blind in both eyes, has lost the use of two or more limbs, or if the veteran is totally disabled as a result of injury or disease incurred in military service. The one-hundred-thousand-dollar ($100,000) exemption shall be one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (i),
 in the case of an eligible veteran whose household income does not exceed the amount of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (h).

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “veteran” means either of the following:

(A) A person who is serving in or has served in and has been discharged under other than dishonorable conditions from service in the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard, and served either in time of war or in time of peace in a campaign or expedition for which a medal has been issued by Congress, or in time of peace and because of a service-connected disability was released from active duty, and who has been determined by the United States
 Department of Veterans Affairs to be eligible for federal veterans’ health and medical benefits.

(B) Any person who would qualify as a veteran pursuant to subparagraph (A) except that they have, as a result of a service-connected injury or disease, died while on active duty in military service. The United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall determine whether an injury or disease is service connected.

(2) For purposes of this section, property is deemed to be the principal place of residence of a veteran, disabled as described in subdivision (a), if either of the following applies:

(A) The veteran is confined to a hospital or other care facility, if that property would be that veteran’s principal place of residence
 were it not for their confinement to a hospital or other care facility, provided that the residence is not rented or leased to a third party. For purposes of this subparagraph, a family member who resides at the residence is not a third party.

(B) A dwelling on the property was completely destroyed in a disaster for which the Governor proclaimed a state of emergency and all of the following apply:

(i) The property qualified as the veteran’s principal place of residence prior to the commencement date of the disaster.

(ii) The property has not changed ownership since the commencement date of the disaster.

(iii) The veteran intends to reconstruct a dwelling on the
 property and occupy the dwelling as their principal place of residence when it is possible to do so.

(iv) In the case of an eligible veteran receiving an increased exemption amount based on household income, as described in subdivision (a), the veteran continues to comply with any applicable annual filing requirement.

(c) (1) Property that is owned by, and that constitutes the principal place of residence of, the unmarried surviving spouse of a deceased veteran is exempt from taxation on that part of the full value of the residence that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (i), in the case of a veteran who was blind in both eyes, had lost the use of two or more
 limbs, or was totally disabled provided that either of the following conditions is met:

(A) The deceased veteran during their lifetime qualified for the exemption pursuant to subdivision (a), or would have qualified for the exemption under the laws effective on January 1, 1977, except that the veteran died prior to January 1, 1977.

(B) The veteran died from a disease that was service connected as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

The one-hundred-thousand-dollar ($100,000) exemption shall be one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (i), in the case of an eligible unmarried surviving spouse whose household income does not exceed the
 amount of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (h).

(2) Commencing with the 1994–95 fiscal year, property that is owned by, and that constitutes the principal place of residence of, the unmarried surviving spouse of a veteran as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is exempt from taxation on that part of the full value of the residence that does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (h). The one-hundred-thousand-dollar ($100,000) exemption shall be one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (i), in the case of an eligible unmarried surviving spouse whose household income does not
 exceed the amount of forty thousand dollars ($40,000), as adjusted for the relevant assessment year as provided in subdivision (h).

(3) Beginning with the 2012–13 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, property is deemed to be the principal place of residence of the unmarried surviving spouse of a deceased veteran, who is confined to a hospital or other care facility, if that property would be the unmarried surviving spouse’s principal place of residence were it not for their confinement to a hospital or other care facility, provided that the residence is not rented or leased to a third party. For purposes of this paragraph, a family member who resides at the residence is not a third party.

(d) As used in this section, “property that is owned by a veteran” or “property
 that is owned by the veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse” includes all of the following:

(1) Property owned by the veteran with the veteran’s spouse as a joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or as community property.

(2) Property owned by the veteran or the veteran’s spouse as separate property.

(3) Property owned with one or more other persons to the extent of the interest owned by the veteran, the veteran’s spouse, or both the veteran and the veteran’s spouse.

(4) Property owned by the veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse with one or more other persons to the extent of the interest owned by the veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse.

(5) So much of the property of a corporation as constitutes the principal place of residence of a veteran or a veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse when the veteran, or the veteran’s spouse, or the veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse is a shareholder of the corporation and the rights of shareholding entitle one to the possession of property, legal title to which is owned by the corporation. The exemption provided by this paragraph shall be shown on the local roll and shall reduce the full value of the corporate property. Notwithstanding any law or articles of incorporation or bylaws of a corporation described in this paragraph, any reduction of property taxes paid by the corporation shall reflect an equal reduction in any charges by the corporation to the person who, by reason of qualifying for the exemption, made possible the reduction for
 the corporation.

(e) For purposes of this section, being blind in both eyes means having a visual acuity of 5/200 or less, or concentric contraction of the visual field to 5 degrees or less; losing the use of a limb means that the limb has been amputated or its use has been lost by reason of ankylosis, progressive muscular dystrophies, or paralysis; and being totally disabled means that the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the military service from which the veteran was discharged has rated the disability at 100 percent or has rated the disability compensation at 100 percent by reason of being unable to secure or follow a substantially gainful occupation.

(f) (1) The county assessor shall accept an electronically generated letter of
 service-connected disability in lieu of an original letter of service-connected disability, at the discretion of the claimant, for purposes of verifying eligibility for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “letter of service-connected disability” means a letter from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs that provides a benefit summary of the claimant’s service-connected disability for purposes of claiming disabled veterans’ exemptions.

(g) An exemption granted to a claimant pursuant to this section shall be in lieu of the veteran’s exemption provided by subdivisions (o), (p), (q), and (r) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution and any other real property tax exemption to which the claimant may be
 entitled. Other real property tax exemptions shall not be granted to any other person with respect to the same residence for which an exemption has been granted pursuant to this section. However, if two or more veterans qualified pursuant to this section coown a property in which they reside, each is entitled to the exemption to the extent of their interest.

(h) Commencing on January 1, 2002, and for each assessment year thereafter, the household income limit shall be compounded annually by an inflation factor that is the annual percentage change, measured from February to February of the two previous
 assessment years, rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of 1 percent, in the California Consumer Price Index for all items, as determined by the California Department of Industrial Relations.

(i) Commencing on January 1, 2006, and for each assessment year thereafter, the exemption amounts set forth in subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be compounded annually by an inflation factor that is the annual percentage change, measured from February to February of the two previous assessment years, rounded to the nearest one-thousandth of 1 percent, in the California Consumer Price Index for all items, as determined by the California Department of Industrial Relations.

(j) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 871 of the Statutes of 2016 shall apply for property tax lien
 dates for the 2017–18 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter.

(k) The county assessor may provide written or electronic determination of preliminary eligibility for an exemption under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.   (SB 663)   Effective October 10, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

205.6.

In order to prevent duplications of the disabled veterans’ property tax exemption within the state and improper overlapping with other benefits provided by law, county assessors may supply information from disabled veterans’ property tax exemption claims and county records as is specified by written request of the board necessary to fully identify all disabled veterans’ property tax exemption claims allowed by the assessors. The board may specify that the information include all or a part
 of the names and social security numbers of claimants and spouses and the identity and location of the dwelling to which the exemption applies. The information may be required in the form of data-processing media or other media and in such format as is compatible with the recordkeeping processes of the counties and the auditing procedures of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 204, Sec. 3.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

206.

The church exemption is as specified in subdivision (f) of Section 3 and Section 5 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

206.1.

(a) Pursuant to the authority of subdivision (d) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, and in accordance with subdivision (b) of this section, all real property that is necessarily and reasonably required for the parking of automobiles of persons who are attending religious services, or are engaged in religious services or worship or any religious activity, is exempt from taxation.

(b) For purposes of the exemption established by subdivision (a), all of the
 following shall apply:

(1) “Real property” means land and improvements or a possessory interest in land and improvements.

(2) The real property is not required to be contiguous to the land on which the church or other structure used for religious services or as the place of worship or religious activity is located.

(3) The real property is not at other times used for commercial purposes. For purposes of this paragraph, “commercial purposes” does not include use of the property for the parking of vehicles or bicycles, the revenue from which does not exceed the ordinary and necessary costs of maintaining the real property.

(4) The exemption shall apply to otherwise qualifying land and improvements regardless of whether the land and improvements are owned
 by the church, religious denomination, or sect using the land and improvements for the parking of automobiles by persons described in subdivision (a). However, the exemption shall apply to land and improvements that are not owned by the church, religious denomination, or sect using the land and improvements for the parking of automobiles by persons described in subdivision (a) only as long as all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The congregation of the church, religious denomination, or sect is no greater than 500 members.

(B) The church, religious denomination, or sect is engaged in a lease of the land and improvements for the exclusive purpose of the parking of automobiles by persons described in subdivision (a).

(C) The church, religious denomination, or sect is responsible, under the terms of its lease
 with the fee owner of the land and improvements, for paying the property taxes levied on the land and improvements. For purposes of this subparagraph, paying property taxes levied on land and improvements includes reimbursement paid to the fee owner of the land and improvements for those taxes.

(D) The real property is used exclusively for the parking of automobiles by persons described in subdivision (a).

(E) The fee owner of the real property and the county agree that the fee owner shall pay the total amount of taxes that would be levied on the real property for the current fiscal year and the first two subsequent fiscal years in the absence of a grant of exemption pursuant to this paragraph for the current fiscal year, if the real property is used for any purpose other than that specified in subparagraph (D) during either of those two subsequent fiscal years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1169, Sec. 3.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

206.2.

Any reduction in property taxes on leased property used exclusively for religious worship and granted the church exemption shall inure to the benefit of the organization entitled to the exemption. If the lease or rental agreement does not specifically provide that the church exemption is taken into account in fixing the terms of the agreement, the tenant shall receive a reduction in rental payments, or a refund of such payments, if paid, for each month of occupancy, or portion thereof, during the fiscal year equal to one-twelfth of the property taxes not paid during such fiscal year by reason of the church exemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 522.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

Property used exclusively for religious purposes shall be exempt from taxation. Property owned and operated by a church and used for religious worship, preschool purposes, nursery school purposes, kindergarten purposes, school purposes of less than collegiate grade, or for purposes of both schools of collegiate grade and schools less than collegiate grade but excluding property used solely for purposes of schools of collegiate grade, shall be deemed to be used exclusively for religious purposes under this section.

The exemption
 provided by this section is granted pursuant to the authority in subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, and shall be known as the “religious exemption.”

This section shall be effective for the 1977–78 fiscal year and fiscal years thereafter.

(History: Amended [as added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 542] by Stats. 1983, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.   Effective June 22, 1983.   Section applicable from July 1, 1977, by this amendment and by Sec. 4 of Ch. 120.)
-------------------------------------------

207.1.

Personal property leased to a church and used exclusively for the purposes described in Section 207 shall be deemed to be used exclusively for religious purposes under that section.

The exemption provided by this section is granted pursuant to the authority in Section 2 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 591, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

208.

The bonds exemption is as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

209.

The exemption of certain vessels from taxation except for state purposes is as specified in subdivision (l) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 311.)
-------------------------------------------

209.5.

All right, title or interest in or to any vessel of more than 50 tons burden or 100 tons displacement, and the materials and parts held by the builder of the vessel at the site of construction for the specific purpose of incorporation therein, shall be exempt from taxation except for state purposes, while the vessel is under construction within this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 283.)
-------------------------------------------

211.

(a) (1) The exemption of fruit- and nut-bearing trees until four years after the season in which they were planted in orchard form and grapevines until three years after the season in which they were planted in vineyard form is as specified in subdivision (i) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(2) For purposes of exemption pursuant to this subdivision, any fruit- or nut-bearing tree, or any grapevine, severely damaged during the
 exemption period by the December 1990 freeze so as to require pruning to the trunk or bud union to establish a new shoot as a replacement for the damaged tree or grapevine, shall be considered a new planting in orchard or vineyard form.

(3) For purposes of exemption pursuant to this subdivision, any fruit- or nut-bearing tree severely damaged during the exemption period by the December 1998 freeze or the January 2007 freeze so as to require pruning to the trunk or bud union to establish a new shoot as a replacement for the damaged tree shall be considered a new planting in orchard form.

(4) For purposes of exemption pursuant to this subdivision, any fruit- or nut-bearing tree, or any grapevine, severely damaged during the exemption period by the extremely strong and damaging winds that commenced on October 20, 2007, that were the subject of the Governor’s November 2, 2007,